Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 17 DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES — WATER RESOURCE BOARD
§ 42-1756. Loans from account — Application — Investigation — Approval — Repayment — Statement — Filing — Default.

Any irrigation district, canal or irrigation company, water users’ association, municipal corporation, municipality, private corporation, aquifer protection district, or, in special cases approved by the board, an individual may file an application with the board for a loan from the revolving account for the purpose of financing project costs. Such application shall be filed in such manner, and shall be in such form and be accompanied by such information as may be prescribed by the board; provided, however, that any such application filed with the board under the provisions of this act, shall:

Describe the nature and purpose(s) of the proposed project.

Set forth or be accompanied by a plan for development of the proposed project, together with such engineering and economic feasibility data and estimated costs of construction as may be required by the board.

State whether money other than that for which application is made to the board will be used for project costs, and whether such money is available or has been sought for this purpose.

Show that the applicant holds or can acquire title to all lands or has the necessary easements and rights-of-way for the project and related lands, and has or can acquire all water rights necessary for the construction, operation and maintenance of the proposed project, or that there exists sufficient water available for appropriation by proof of a permit issued by the director of the department of water resources.

Upon receipt of an application, the board shall evaluate and, if it deems it to be necessary, investigate all aspects of the proposed project and the proposed construction thereof. As a part of such investigation, the board shall determine whether the plan for development of the project is satisfactory. If the board determines that the plan is unsatisfactory, it shall return the application to the applicant and may make such recommendations to the applicant as are considered necessary to make the plan satisfactory.

The board may approve a loan for project costs if after investigation (if this is deemed necessary,) and evaluation it finds that:

The plan does not conflict with any extant Idaho state water plan;

The proposed project is feasible from an engineering standpoint and economically justified, with studies showing a favorable benefit to cost ratio;

The plan for development of the proposed project is satisfactory;

The applicant is qualified and responsible;

There is reasonable assurance that the borrower can repay the loan; and

That money in the revolving account is available for the loan.

If the board approves a loan, the board and the applicant or applicants shall enter into an agreement for repayment to the revolving account of money loaned therefrom, together with interest thereon at reasonable rates as determined by the board. The agreement shall further provide that repayment of the loan, together with interest thereon, shall commence no later than one (1) full year after construction of the project is completed, and that repayment shall be completed within the time period specified by the board; provided that repayment to reserve accounts or guarantee funds shall be made as provided by order of the board. The repayment period shall not exceed sixty (60) years, except that the board may extend the time for making repayment in the event of emergency or hardship. Such agreement shall also provide for such assurances of, and security for, repayment of the loan as are considered necessary by the board.
(5) The state shall have a lien upon a project constructed with money from the revolving account for the amount of the loan, together with the interest thereon. This lien shall attach to all project facilities, equipment, easements, real property and property of any kind or nature associated with the project and all water rights associated in any way with the project. The board shall file a statement of the loan, its amount, terms and a description of the project with the county recorder of each county in which the project or any part thereof is located. The county recorder shall record the lien in a book kept for the recording of liens and it shall be indexed as other liens are required by law to be indexed. The lien shall be valid until paid in full or otherwise discharged. The lien shall be foreclosed in accordance with applicable state law governing foreclosure of mortgages and liens as set forth in chapter 1 of title 6, Idaho Code, chapter 13 of title 45, Idaho Code, and related provisions of the statutes of this state.

(6) If an applicant fails to comply with the repayment contract, its interest in the project may be conveyed to a successor upon approval by the board, which may contract with the qualified successor in interest of the original obligor for repayment of the loan, together with the interest thereon, and for succession to its rights and obligations in any contract with the board.

(7) The state shall have a lien on any or all projects which the board improves or renovates with money from the revolving account, and such lien shall be valid and continue in effect until such funds, together with interest thereon, have been paid in full and the lien discharged. The board shall file a statement of the lien, and the lien shall be foreclosed upon all project property and rights as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

§ 42-1757. Members of board — Conflicts of interest.

No member of the board shall participate in the action of the board, nor be present during the board’s deliberations, concerning an application for a loan by an entity in which such board member is an officer, agent or employee, or in which such board member has any interest.

§ 42-1758. Rules and regulations.

The board may make such rules and regulations consistent with this act as it considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.

§ 42-1759. Annual report and financial statement to governor and legislature.

An annual report shall be made to the governor and the legislature prior to each November following the close of the year, describing the work accomplished by use of the revolving development fund and including a complete financial statement.

§ 42-1760. Water management account.

There is hereby created and established in the trust and agency fund the water management account. All moneys in the account are appropriated continuously to the water resource board to be used and administered by it for the purposes specified in subsection (2) of this section, and shall not be subject to the provisions of the standard appropriations act of 1945 or section 67-3516, Idaho Code. The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the account, and the interest earned on such investments shall be retained by the account.

The board may expend, loan or grant moneys from the water management account for new water projects or the rehabilitation of existing water projects limited to the following purposes: reclamation, upstream storage, offstream storage, aquifer recharge, reservoir site acquisition and protection, water supply, water quality, recreation, and water resource studies, including feasibility studies for qualifying projects. The board shall have the authority to determine which water projects are undertaken pursuant to this section.

Expenditures may be made from the account to provide public moneys for participation in any project constructed with funds from the water resource board revolving development account provided by section 42-1756, Idaho Code.

Grants and loans may be made by the board from the account for any project in the public interest for the projects authorized by this section; no single grant shall exceed $50,000 unless legislative approval has been obtained.

Expenditures may be made from the account for the costs of the following large water infrastructure projects:

Costs associated with the construction of a raise of Anderson ranch dam, located on the south fork of the Boise river;

Costs associated with the Mountain Home air force base water delivery and treatment systems; and

The enlargement or construction of new or existing surface storage reservoirs owned and operated by the United States bureau of reclamation or army corps of engineers.

The selection of any new large water infrastructure project selected pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection must consider and protect existing water rights and consider the effects of such projects on other water uses, such as water quality, fish and wildlife, recreation, and hydropower, that provide economic value, stability, and other benefits to the citizens of the state.

Any large infrastructure project receiving any portion of the funds approved pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section shall require that at least fifty percent (50%) matching funds be provided by parties other than the state. In the event of in-kind contributions, the board shall determine the value of the in-kind contribution.

On or before the first day of each regular legislative session, the board shall submit to the legislature a report of any moneys expended or obligated and any work begun and/or completed in the prior or current fiscal year on a project selected pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section.

§ 42-1761. Water supply bank created.

The water resource board shall have the duty of operating a water supply bank. The water supply bank shall make use of and obtain the highest duty for beneficial use from water, provide a source of adequate water supplies to benefit new and supplemental water uses, and provide a source of funding for improving water user facilities and efficiencies.

§ 42-1762. Rules and regulations — Acquisition of water rights.

The water resource board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the management, control, delivery and use and distribution of water to and from the water supply bank in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The board may contract with lessors and lessees to act as an intermediary in facilitating the rental of water. The board may purchase, lease, or otherwise obtain decreed, licensed or permitted water rights to be credited to the water supply bank. The use to which the owner is entitled under the water right shall be reduced by the portion of the water right leased to the bank. The water rights may be retained in the water supply bank for a period as determined by the board, all under such provisions as are specified in the terms of the purchase or lease.

§ 42-1763. Rentals from bank — Approval by director.

The terms and conditions of any rental of water from the water supply bank must be approved by the director of the department of water resources. The director of the department of water resources may reject and refuse approval for or may partially approve for a less quantity of water or may approve upon conditions any proposed rental of water from the water supply bank where the proposed use is such that it will reduce the quantity of water available under other existing water rights, the water supply involved is insufficient for the purpose for which it is sought, the rental would cause the use of water to be enlarged beyond that authorized under the water right to be rented, the rental will conflict with the local public interest as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, or the rental will adversely affect the local economy of the watershed or local area within which the source of water for the proposed use originates, in the case where the place of use is outside of the watershed or local area where the source of water originates. The director shall consider in determining whether to approve a rental of water for use outside of the state of Idaho those factors enumerated in subsection (3) of section 42-401, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1763A. Interim authority for rental of storage water to augment lower snake river flows during the migration of snake river salmon. [Null and void date January 1, 1996.]

§ 42-1763B. Interim authority for rental of water to augment flows for listed anadromous fish.

Legislative findings and intent regarding rental of water by the U.S. bureau of reclamation in the Snake River basin within Idaho to augment lower Snake River flows for anadromous fish listed under the endangered species act. The legislature finds that the U.S. bureau of reclamation proposes to release up to four hundred twenty-seven thousand (427,000) acre feet of leased or uncontracted water diverted from the Snake River basin to reservoir storage above Lewiston, and to lease or acquire up to sixty thousand (60,000) acre feet of consumptive natural flow water rights diverted and consumed below Milner dam and above Swan Falls dam from the mainstem [main stem] of the Snake River to augment flows downstream of Hells Canyon dam during 2005 and through December 31, 2034. The state of Idaho is experiencing serious drought conditions and it is therefore uncertain whether this water will be available for rental for flow augmentation purposes in all years. The legislature further finds that authorization of this legislation is necessary for approval and implementation of the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004 (Mediator’s Term Sheet dated April 20, 2004, and submitted on that date to the SRBA Court in SRBA Consolidated Subcase 03-10022 and SRBA Consolidated Subcase 67-13701, with all appendices to the document), as approved, ratified, and confirmed by the 108th Congress of the United States in the “Snake River Water Rights Act of 2004,” Pub. L. No. 108-447 (H.R. 4818), 118 Stat. 3431 to 3441 (December 8, 2004). Therefore, the legislature authorizes the U.S. bureau of reclamation to lease storage and natural flow water rights through the state water supply bank and local rental pools under the limited conditions of this section. Any rentals of water for flow augmentation under any other provision of law, including section 42-108A, Idaho Code, shall be subject to the limitations and conditions of this section and the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004.

Rental of water by the U.S. bureau of reclamation.

Notwithstanding the legislative approval required in section 42-108, Idaho Code, any storage water released and any natural flow water rights leased or acquired by the bureau within the state of Idaho for listed anadromous fish pursuant to this section must be rented through the water bank operated by the Idaho water resource board pursuant to sections 42-1761 through 42-1764, Idaho Code, or, in the case of storage water releases, through local rental committees, created pursuant to section 42-1765, Idaho Code, under their respective water bank rules.

For any rental of water pursuant to this section, the director shall not be required to determine under section 42-1763, Idaho Code, whether the water supply is sufficient for the purpose for which it is sought, whether the rental would cause the use of water to be enlarged beyond that authorized under the water right to be rented, whether such use is in the public interest, or whether such use is consistent with the factors enumerated under subsection (3) of section 42-401, Idaho Code.
(3) Conditions on water rentals.

In no event shall the release of water under this section cause the water surface of Lake Cascade to be below the elevation required to maintain a storage volume of three hundred thousand (300,000) acre feet, fifty thousand (50,000) acre feet of which is dead space, which is currently estimated to be at an elevation of four thousand eight hundred nine and two-tenths (4,809.2) feet. In addition, the state of Idaho shall pursue a shaping agreement for any uncontracted water released from Lake Cascade under this section.

The rental or use of water under this section shall be in compliance with any permit, applicable water quality rule and regulation or other requirements of the clean water act, shall not cause jeopardy to other species in the state of Idaho, and shall not result in significant adverse impacts to recreational uses of the waters of the Snake River basin in Idaho. The state of Idaho shall not require any restriction, modification, or condition on the diversion, storage, use, discharge of water, or land use to remedy or address violations of water quality standards or other clean water act requirements to the extent the rental or use of water by the U.S. bureau of reclamation under this section causes the violations.

The U.S. bureau of reclamation shall submit a report to the director by January 15 of each year describing the time, volume and purpose of water provided for listed anadromous fish from the Snake River basin above Lewiston during the past year and shall report on the plan for the spring and summer chinook by April 1 and on the plan for the fall chinook by July 15 of each year.

All water rented or used by the U.S. bureau of reclamation under this section from above Hells Canyon dam must be used for power production purposes within the state of Idaho.

All water rented or used by the U.S. bureau of reclamation under this section shall be subject to the terms and conditions contained in the Snake River Flow Component of the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004.

Nothing herein shall entitle the U.S. bureau of reclamation to rent or use water for flow augmentation upon termination or expiration of the permission given in this section.

(a) Any water made available under this section shall be obtained only from willing lessors. Any water rented under this section from sources located within a basin having a local rental committee established pursuant to section 42-1765, Idaho Code, or section 42-1765A, Idaho Code, shall be rented pursuant to this section only through the local rental committee.

(b) Storage water made available under this section shall be limited to four hundred twenty-seven thousand (427,000) acre feet annually, and natural consumptive flow water shall be limited to not more than the sixty thousand (60,000) acre feet annually, that accrue to natural flow water rights, acquired or leased by the U.S. bureau of reclamation pursuant to the terms of the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004. These amounts shall be reduced by other water the U.S. bureau of reclamation provides for flow augmentation for listed anadromous fish from the Snake River basin above Lewiston.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter, or authorize the U.S. bureau of reclamation to modify in any way its existing contractual obligations, or to constitute a finding by the legislature that the rental or use of storage water or natural flow water rights for flow augmentation for listed anadromous fish or any other species is a beneficial use of water, that it is in the public interest, or whether such use injures existing water rights.

(5) This section shall not become effective until the director certifies to the governor that the U.S. bureau of reclamation’s applications to transfer water right numbers 4616, 4617, 4618, 4623, 4625, 4626, 4627, 4628, 4629, 4630, 4631, 4632, 4633 and 4636, and to amend water right permit numbers 25-07004 and 63-3618 will be withdrawn, or held in abeyance while this section is in effect, and the governor further certifies that the biological opinions required by the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004 have been issued.
(6) This act shall be null, void and of no force and effect upon the expiration or termination of the Snake River Flow Component of the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004. In addition, it is the intent of the legislature to consider the repeal of this section in the event that any of the provisions of the Snake River Flow Component of the Snake River Water Rights Agreement of 2004 are modified or declared arbitrary, capricious or otherwise unlawful or set aside by any federal court or there is a finding of jeopardy by any federal court in regard to any biological opinions for projects operated by the U.S. bureau of reclamation in the Snake River basin in Idaho.

§ 42-1764. Substitution for transfer proceeding — Rights not subject to forfeiture — No dedication of rights.

The approval of a rental of water from the water supply bank may be a substitute for the transfer proceeding requirements of section 42-222, Idaho Code.

Water rights obtained by the board or by a local committee appointed by the board and credited to the water supply bank are not subject to forfeiture for nonuse pursuant to section 42-222(2), Idaho Code, while retained in or rented from the water supply bank. The five (5) year period of nonuse for forfeiture of a water right shall begin to accrue upon removal of a right from the bank by the owner of the right if a period of nonuse did not occur prior to the date of acceptance of the right into the bank. The five (5) year period of nonuse shall continue to accrue if a period of nonuse occurred prior to the effective date of acceptance of the right into the bank and the right was not beneficially used while in the bank.

The rental of water rights from the water supply bank shall not constitute a dedication to the lands of any renter since the rental or distribution of water by the water bank is only incidental to its primary purposes listed in section 42-1761, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1765. Local committees — Rental of stored water — Apportionment of rental proceeds.

The water resource board may appoint local committees, including water district advisory committees as provided in section 42-605(6), Idaho Code, to facilitate the rental of stored water. When so appointed, the committee shall have the authority to market stored water between consenting owners and consenting renters under rules and regulations adopted by the board. The director of the department of water resources may approve a general lease which the local rental committee may utilize to meet the approval requirements enumerated in section 42-1763, Idaho Code.

In exercising its authority under this section, the local rental committee, if also the advisory committee of a water district, shall determine, in advance, at the annual meeting of water users of the water district held pursuant to section 42-605, Idaho Code, each year, that portion of the proceeds for the year from the lease of stored water to be paid to consenting contract holders of the storage water rights as reimbursement for their costs and that portion to be retained by the district in which the committee is located. Any proceeds retained by a district shall be used exclusively by the advisory committee of the water district for public purposes as set forth in section 42-613A, Idaho Code, and as provided by resolutions adopted by the water users of the district.

§ 42-1765A. Lemhi river basin — Local rental committee.

The water resource board will appoint a local rental committee to facilitate operation of the water supply bank within the Lemhi river basin comprised of the Lemhi river and all tributary water sources. Section 42-1765, Idaho Code, and the board’s water supply bank rules applicable to the operation of a storage water rental pool shall apply to the operation of the water supply bank in the Lemhi river basin, except as inconsistent with this section.

When so appointed, the local rental committee for the Lemhi river basin shall have authority to rent natural flow water rights between consenting owners and consenting renters.

Rights to the use of water for a portion of the approved period of use under a water right may be accepted into the water supply bank and rented out to satisfy the board’s minimum stream flow water right authorized under section 42-1506, Idaho Code, provided the owner demonstrates to the satisfaction of the director that there will be an equivalent reduction in the extent of beneficial use made under the right.

§ 42-1765B. Wood River basin — Water rights donated to enhance instream flows and downstream water supplies

Local committee. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 262, § 4, effective December 31, 2012.

§ 42-1766. Appeals procedure for water right holders.

During the period of a lease, any water right holder who determines that the lease is causing a water right to which the holder is entitled, to be deprived of water to which it may be otherwise entitled, may petition the director of the department of water resources to revoke or modify the lease. Upon such a petition, the director shall cause an investigation to be made and may hold hearings or gather information in some other manner. In the event that the director finds that an interference is occurring, he may revoke or require the lease to be modified to insure that no injury to other water rights occurs.

Any person feeling aggrieved by a decision or action of the director shall be entitled to contest the action of the director pursuant to section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code.

§ 42-1767. Approval of projects — Authority of water users to contract with board — Authorizing the board’s acquisition of interest in projects.

Irrigation districts, canal companies, irrigation companies, water user associations and water associations are authorized to hold elections, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, for the purpose of submitting a question to their qualified voters, members or stockholders, as the case may be, as to whether the district, company or association should finance the projects and facilities through the Idaho water resource board for the purposes set forth in section 42-1740, Idaho Code. A two-thirds (2/3) vote is required to approve the project. Any irrigation district, canal company, irrigation company, water user association or water association, is hereby authorized to enter into any agreement or agreements with the board with respect to an approved project within the state of Idaho, including but not limited to, agreements providing for the sale, lease or other transfer of title to real and personal property or providing for the maintenance or operation of projects rehabilitated or repaired, or pertaining to the loan or grant of funds for such projects, and said irrigation district, canal company, irrigation company, water user association or water association is hereby authorized to levy assessments as may be necessary therefor. The statutory rights and duties of any such entity shall not in any way be limited or diminished due to any such agreement or agreements with the board. In the event the board acquires an ownership interest, the board shall not assume any liabilities thereon as a result of such transfer of ownership, provided however, that it shall not acquire any voting rights in any irrigation district, canal company, water user’s association or similar entity as a result thereof.

§ 42-1768. Task force to study issues pertaining to the development of the Bear River. [Expired.]

§ 42-1769 — 42-1774. [Reserved.]

The welfare and well-being of the people of the state of Idaho is dependent upon the conservation, development and optimum use of the state’s water resources. Water development involves extensive planning, special studies, public support and efficient implementation. The people of Idaho declared their intention to develop the state’s water resources in the Idaho constitution, article 15, section 7, providing for a state water plan. Funding by the state of Idaho will insure timely implementation of water projects in the public interest.

§ 42-1776. Water resources conservation and development trust account.

There is hereby created and established in the agency asset fund the water resources conservation and development trust account. All moneys in the account are to be utilized by the Idaho water resources board, upon appropriation by the legislature, to conduct water project feasibility and engineering studies authorized in conjunction with the powers and duties of the board as provided in section 42-1734, Idaho Code, and to secure revenue bonds authorized by section 42-1739, Idaho Code.

The state treasurer is directed to invest all moneys in the account. All interest or other income occurring from such investment shall accrue to the account.

In the event that a project is approved subsequent to a feasibility study funded from the account, the funds expended from the account shall be included as a cost of the project to be repaid to the fund through repayments contracted by the board. It shall be the duty of the board to specify such repayment provisions without regard to the source of funding of the project.

§ 42-1777. Water resources adjudication fund.

A water resource adjudication fund is hereby created and established in the state treasury. The state controller may establish multiple fund details within the fund to account for fees collected from different adjudications. Fee moneys in the fund are to be utilized by the department of water resources, upon appropriation by the legislature, to pay the costs of the department attributable to general water rights adjudications conducted pursuant to chapter 14, title 42, Idaho Code.

Fee moneys in the fund may also be utilized by the judiciary, upon appropriation by the legislature, to pay for judicial expenses directly relating to each adjudication including, but not limited to, compensation and expenses of special masters appointed by the Idaho supreme court or by the district court, compensation and expenses of clerical staff of the district court, and publication, notice and mailing costs incurred by the district court.

The state treasurer is directed to invest all moneys in the fund. All interest or other income accruing from such investment shall accrue to the appropriate fund detail.

§ 42-1778. Water rights enforcement account.

The water rights enforcement account is hereby created and established in the agency asset fund.

All moneys in the water rights enforcement account are reserved, set aside, appropriated and made available until expended as may be directed by the director of the department of water resources in carrying out a water rights enforcement program.

§ 42-1779. Statewide comprehensive aquifer planning and management effort.

Pursuant to the provisions of Idaho law and legislative funding approval, the Idaho water resource board and the Idaho department of water resources shall conduct a statewide comprehensive aquifer planning and management effort over a ten (10) year period of time beginning in fiscal year 2009. Funding for the statewide comprehensive aquifer planning and management effort shall be used for technical studies, facilitation services, hydrologic monitoring, measurement and comprehensive plan development as well as for personnel costs, operating expenses and capital outlay associated with the statewide comprehensive aquifer planning and management effort.

§ 42-1780. Aquifer planning and management fund — Secondary aquifer planning, management and implementation fund.

The aquifer planning and management fund is hereby created in the state treasury. Pursuant to appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used for technical studies, facilitation services, hydrologic monitoring, measurement and comprehensive plan development as well as for personnel costs, operating expenditures and capital outlay associated with the statewide comprehensive aquifer planning and management effort. The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the fund, and the interest earned on such investments shall be retained by the fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury, the secondary aquifer planning, management and implementation fund, hereinafter referred to as the secondary fund. The secondary fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund, moneys voluntarily contributed by water users or through water delivery entities or districts having authority to contribute, or through contributions, gifts or grants from any other source, and any other moneys that may hereafter be provided by law. All moneys in the secondary fund shall be used for the purposes for which the moneys were provided through appropriation, contribution or otherwise, and moneys in the secondary fund are appropriated continuously to the water resource board for technical studies, project management services, hydrologic monitoring, measurement and comprehensive plan development, as well as for personnel costs, operating expenditures, capital outlay and water projects associated with the statewide comprehensive aquifer planning and management effort, and shall not be subject to the provisions of the standard appropriations act of 1945 or the provisions of section 67-3516, Idaho Code. The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the fund, and the interest earned on such investments shall be retained by the fund.

§ 42-1730. Statement of purpose.

§ 42-1775. Declaration of policy and purpose.